test/src/morphology/N-ooqrwn_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ǭʼrõn: # Noun 236 'eng /est riie/fin' - full paradigm
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Nom: ǭʼrõn
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Gen: ǭʼrõn
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Par: ǭʼrõnt
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Dat: ǭʼrõnõn
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Ins: ǭʼrõnõks
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Ill: ǭʼrõnõ
     ǭʼrõn+N+Sg+Ela: ǭʼrõnõst
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Nom: ǭʼrõnd
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Gen: ǭʼrõnd
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Par: ǭʼriņi
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Dat: ǭʼrõndõn
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Ins: ǭʼrõndõks
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Ill: ǭʼriņiž
     ǭʼrõn+N+Pl+Ela: ǭʼriņist
